Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.307

Seattle Vocational Institute—Funding.

Funding for the institute shall be included in a separate allocation to the sixth college district, and funds allocated for the institute shall be used only for purposes of the institute.

[ 1991 c 238 s 101.]